Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 1 General Provisions
§ 28-9-105. Control of electronic chattel paper.

A secured party has control of electronic chattel paper if a system employed for evidencing the transfer of interests in the chattel paper reliably establishes the secured party as the person to which the chattel paper was assigned.

A system satisfies subsection (a) of this section, and a secured party has control of electronic chattel paper, if the record or records comprising the chattel paper are created, stored and assigned in such a manner that:

A single authoritative copy of the record or records exists which is unique, identifiable and, except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (4), (5) and (6) of this subsection, unalterable;

The authoritative copy identifies the secured party as the assignee of the record or records;

The authoritative copy is communicated to and maintained by the secured party or its designated custodian;

Copies or amendments that add or change an identified assignee of the authoritative copy can be made only with the consent of the secured party;

Each copy of the authoritative copy and any copy of a copy is readily identifiable as a copy that is not the authoritative copy; and

Any amendment of the authoritative copy is readily identifiable as authorized or unauthorized.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-105, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2012, ch. 145, § 2, p. 381.

§ 28-9-106. Control of investment property.

A person has control of a certificated security, uncertificated security, or security entitlement as provided in section 28-8-106[, Idaho Code].

A secured party has control of a commodity contract if:

The secured party is the commodity intermediary with which the commodity contract is carried; or

The commodity customer, secured party and commodity intermediary have agreed that the commodity intermediary will apply any value distributed on account of the commodity contract as directed by the secured party without further consent by the commodity customer.

A secured party having control of all security entitlements or commodity contracts carried in a securities account or commodity account has control over the securities account or commodity account.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-106, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-107. Control of letter of credit right.

A secured party has control of a letter of credit right to the extent of any right to payment or performance by the issuer or any nominated person if the issuer or nominated person has consented to an assignment of proceeds of the letter of credit under section 28-5-114(3)[, Idaho Code,] or otherwise applicable law or practice.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-107, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-108. Sufficiency of description.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c), (d) and (e) of this section, a description of personal or real property is sufficient, whether or not it is specific, if it reasonably identifies what is described.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, a description of collateral reasonably identifies the collateral if it identifies the collateral by:

Specific listing;

Category;

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, a type of collateral defined in the uniform commercial code;

Quantity;

Computational or allocational formula or procedure; or

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, any other method, if the identity of the collateral is objectively determinable.

A description of collateral as “all the debtor’s assets” or “all the debtor’s personal property” or using words of similar import does not reasonably identify the collateral.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, a description of a security entitlement, securities account or commodity account is sufficient if it describes:

The collateral by those terms or as investment property; or

The underlying financial asset or commodity contract.

A description only by type of collateral defined in the uniform commercial code is an insufficient description of:

A commercial tort claim; or

In a consumer transaction, consumer goods, a security entitlement, a securities account or a commodity account.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-108, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-109. Scope.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d), this chapter applies to:

A transaction, regardless of its form, that creates a security interest in personal property or fixtures by contract;

An agricultural lien;

A sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles or promissory notes;

A consignment;

A security interest arising under section 28-2-401, 28-2-505, 28-2-711(3) or 28-12-508(5)[, Idaho Code], as provided in section 28-9-110[, Idaho Code]; and

A security interest arising under section 28-4-210 or 28-5-120[, Idaho Code].

The application of this chapter to a security interest in a secured obligation is not affected by the fact that the obligation is itself secured by a transaction or interest to which this chapter does not apply.

This chapter does not apply to the extent that:

A statute, regulation, or treaty of the United States preempts this chapter;

Another statute of this state expressly governs the creation, perfection, priority or enforcement of a security interest created by this state or a governmental unit of this state;

A statute of another state, a foreign country, or a governmental unit of another state or a foreign country, other than a statute generally applicable to security interests, expressly governs creation, perfection, priority or enforcement of a security interest created by the state, country or governmental unit; or

The rights of a transferee beneficiary or nominated person under a letter of credit are independent and superior under section 28-5-114[, Idaho Code].

This chapter does not apply to:

A landlord’s lien, other than an agricultural lien;

A lien, other than an agricultural lien, given by statute or other rule of law for services or materials, but section 28-9-333[, Idaho Code,] applies with respect to priority of the lien;

An assignment of a claim for wages, salary or other compensation of an employee;

A sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles or promissory notes as part of a sale of the business out of which they arose;

An assignment of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles or promissory notes which is for the purpose of collection only;

An assignment of a right to payment under a contract to an assignee that is also obligated to perform under the contract;

An assignment of a single account, payment intangible or promissory note to an assignee in full or partial satisfaction of a preexisting indebtedness;

A transfer of an interest in or an assignment of a claim under a policy of insurance, other than an assignment by or to a health care provider of a health care insurance receivable and any subsequent assignment of the right to payment, but sections 28-9-315 and 28-9-322[, Idaho Code,] apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds;

An assignment of a right represented by a judgment, other than a judgment taken on a right to payment that was collateral;

A right of recoupment or set-off, but:
(A) section 28-9-340[, Idaho Code,] applies with respect to the effectiveness of rights of recoupment or set-off against deposit accounts; and

The creation or transfer of an interest in or lien on real property, including a lease or rents thereunder, except to the extent that provision is made for:

liens on real property in sections 28-9-203 and 28-9-308[, Idaho Code];

fixtures in section 28-9-334[, Idaho Code];

fixture filings in sections 28-9-501, 28-9-502, 28-9-512, 28-9-516 and 28-9-519[, Idaho Code]; and

security agreements covering personal and real property in section 28-9-604[, Idaho Code];

An assignment of a claim arising in tort, other than a commercial tort claim, but sections 28-9-315 and 28-9-322[, Idaho Code,] apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds;

A claim or right to receive compensation for injuries or sickness as described in (i) 26 U.S.C. section 104(a)(1) and (ii) on and after the effective date of this chapter, in 26 U.S.C. section 104(a)(2), as those sections may be amended from time to time. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this chapter (other than sections 28-9-406(d) and 28-9-408(a) and (c), Idaho Code, in the case of transfers made on and after the effective date of this chapter) shall apply to such compensation as described in 26 U.S.C. section 104(a)(2) if the sale, pledge, assignment or other transfer of rights to receive such compensation under a structured settlement is approved by the final order of a court pursuant to, and otherwise complies with, the requirements of paragraph (B) of this subsection.
(13)(A) A claim or right to receive compensation for injuries or sickness as described in (i) 26 U.S.C. section 104(a)(1) and (ii) on and after the effective date of this chapter, in 26 U.S.C. section 104(a)(2), as those sections may be amended from time to time. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this chapter (other than sections 28-9-406(d) and 28-9-408(a) and (c), Idaho Code, in the case of transfers made on and after the effective date of this chapter) shall apply to such compensation as described in 26 U.S.C. section 104(a)(2) if the sale, pledge, assignment or other transfer of rights to receive such compensation under a structured settlement is approved by the final order of a court pursuant to, and otherwise complies with, the requirements of paragraph (B) of this subsection.

(i) Definitions. For purposes of this subsection:

(B) section 28-9-404[, Idaho Code,] applies with respect to defenses or claims of an account debtor;

10. “qualified assignment agreement” means an agreement providing for a qualified assignment within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. section 130, as amended from time to time;

11. “settled claim” means the original tort claim resolved by a structured settlement;

12. “structured settlement” means an arrangement for periodic payment of damages for personal injuries or sickness established by settlement or judgment in resolution of a tort claim;

13. “structured settlement agreement” means the agreement, judgment, stipulation, or release embodying the terms of a structured settlement;

14. “structured settlement obligor” means, with respect to any structured settlement, the party that has the continuing obligation to make periodic payments to the payee under a structured settlement agreement or a qualified assignment agreement;

15. “structured settlement payment rights” means rights to receive periodic payments under a structured settlement, whether from the structured settlement obligor or the annuity issuer, where:

the payee is domiciled in, or the domicile or principal place of business of the structured settlement obligor or the annuity issuer is located in, this state; or

the structured settlement agreement was approved by a court in this state; or

the structured settlement agreement is expressly governed by the laws of this state;

a listing of each of the payee’s dependents, together with each dependent’s age;

notification that any interested party is entitled to support, oppose or otherwise respond to the transferee’s application, either in person or by counsel, by submitting written comments to the court or by participating in the hearing; and

notification of the time and place of the hearing and notification of the manner in which and the time by which written responses to the application must be filed (which shall be not less than fifteen (15) days after service of the transferee’s notice) in order to be considered by the court.

16. “terms of the structured settlement” include, with respect to any structured settlement, the terms of the structured settlement agreement, the annuity contract, any qualified assignment agreement and any order or other approval of any court or other government authority that authorized or approved such structured settlement;

17. “transfer” means any sale, assignment, pledge, hypothecation or other alienation or encumbrance of structured settlement payment rights made by a payee for consideration; provided that the term “transfer” does not include the creation or perfection of a security interest in structured settlement payment rights under a blanket security agreement entered into with an insured depository institution, in the absence of any action to redirect the structured settlement payments to such insured depository institution, or an agent or successor in interest thereof, or otherwise to enforce such blanket security interest against the structured settlement payment rights;

18. “transfer agreement” means the agreement providing for a transfer of structured settlement payment rights;

19. “transfer expenses” means all expenses of a transfer that are required under the transfer agreement to be paid by the payee or deducted from the gross advance amount, including, without limitation, court filing fees, attorney’s fees, escrow fees, lien recordation fees, judgment and lien search fees, finder’s fees, commissions, and other payments to a broker or other intermediary; “transfer expenses” do not include preexisting obligations of the payee payable for the payee’s account from the proceeds of a transfer;

20. “transferee” means a party acquiring or proposing to acquire structured settlement payment rights through a transfer.

the amounts and due dates of the structured settlement payments to be transferred;
2. the aggregate amount of such payments;

The transferee shall be liable to the structured settlement obligor and the annuity issuer:

Neither the annuity issuer nor the structured settlement obligor may be required to divide any periodic payment between the payee and any transferee or assignee or between two (2) or more transferees or assignees; and

Any further transfer of structured settlement payment rights by the payee may be made only after compliance with all of the requirements of this subsection.

3. the discounted present value of the payments to be transferred, which shall be identified as the “calculation of current value of the transferred structured settlement payments under federal standards for valuing annuities,” and the amount of the applicable federal rate used in calculating such discounted present value;

4. the gross advance amount;

5. an itemized listing of all applicable transfer expenses, other than attorney’s fees and related disbursements payable in connection with the transferee’s application for approval of the transfer, and the transferee’s best estimate of the amount of any such fees and disbursements;

6. the net advance amount;

7. the amount of any penalties or liquidated damages payable by the payee in the event of any breach of the transfer agreement by the payee; and

8. a statement that the payee has the right to cancel the transfer agreement, without penalty or further obligation, not later than the third business day after the date the agreement is signed by the payee.

1. No direct or indirect transfer of structured settlement payment rights shall be effective and no structured settlement obligor or annuity issuer shall be required to make any payment directly or indirectly to any transferee of structured settlement payment rights unless the transfer has been approved in advance in a final court order based on express findings by such court that:

A. the transfer is in the best interest of the payee, taking into account the welfare and support of the payee’s dependents;

B. the payee has been advised in writing by the transferee to seek independent professional advice regarding the transfer and has either received such advice or knowingly waived such advice in writing; and

C. the transfer does not contravene any applicable statute or the order of any court or other government authority.

1. The structured settlement obligor and the annuity issuer shall, as to all parties except the transferee, be discharged and released from any and all liability for the transferred payments;

A. if the transfer contravenes the terms of the structured settlement, for any taxes incurred by such parties as a consequence of the transfer; and

B. for any other liabilities or costs, including reasonable costs and attorney’s fees, arising from compliance by such parties with the order of the court or arising as a consequence of the transferee’s failure to comply with this subsection;

1. An application under this subsection for approval of a transfer of structured settlement payment rights shall be made by the transferee and may be brought in the county in which the payee resides, in the county in which the structured settlement obligor or the annuity issuer maintains its principal place of business, or in any court which approved the structured settlement agreement.
2. Not less than twenty (20) days prior to the scheduled hearing on any application for approval of a transfer of structured settlement payment rights under paragraph (B)(iii) of this subsection, the transferee shall file with the court and serve on all interested parties a notice of the proposed transfer and the application for its authorization, including with such notice:

A. a copy of the transferee’s application;

B. a copy of the transfer agreement;

C. a copy of the disclosure statement required under paragraph (B)(ii) of this subsection;

The provisions of this subsection may not be waived by any payee.

Any transfer agreement entered into on or after the effective date of this subsection by a payee who resides in this state shall provide that disputes under such transfer agreement, including any claim that the payee has breached the agreement, shall be determined in and under the laws of this state. No such transfer agreement shall authorize the transferee or any other party to confess judgment or consent to entry of judgment against the payee.

No transfer of structured settlement payment rights shall extend to any payments that are life-contingent unless, prior to the date on which the payee signs the transfer agreement, the transferee has established and has agreed to maintain procedures reasonably satisfactory to the annuity issuer and the structured settlement obligor for (i) periodically confirming the payee’s survival, and (ii) giving the annuity issuer and the structured settlement obligor prompt written notice in the event of the payee’s death.

No payee who proposes to make a transfer of structured settlement payment rights shall incur any penalty, forfeit any application fee or other payment, or otherwise incur any liability to the proposed transferee or any assignee based on any failure of such transfer to satisfy the conditions of this subsection.

Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to authorize any transfer of structured settlement payment rights in contravention of any law or to imply that any transfer under a transfer agreement entered into prior to the effective date of this subsection is valid or invalid.

Compliance with the requirements set forth in paragraph (B)(ii) of this subsection and fulfillment of the conditions set forth in paragraph (B)(iii) of this subsection shall be solely the responsibility of the transferee in any transfer of structured settlement payment rights, and neither the structured settlement obligor nor the annuity issuer shall bear any responsibility for, or any liability arising from, noncompliance with such requirements or failure to fulfill such conditions.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-109, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2001, ch. 299, § 1, p. 1078.

§ 28-9-110. Security interests arising under chapter 2 or 12, title 28, Idaho Code.

A security interest arising under section 28-2-401, 28-2-505, 28-2-711(3) or 28-12-508(5)[, Idaho Code,] is subject to this chapter. However, until the debtor obtains possession of the goods:

The security interest is enforceable, even if section 28-9-203(b)(3)[, Idaho Code,] has not been satisfied;

Filing is not required to perfect the security interest;

The rights of the secured party after default by the debtor are governed by chapter 2 or 12, title 28, Idaho Code; and

The security interest has priority over a conflicting security interest created by the debtor.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-110, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-111. Applicability of bulk transfer laws. [Repealed.]

§ 28-9-112 — 28-9-116. Where collateral is not owned by debtor. Security interests arising under chapter on sales or under chapter on leases. Consignment. Investment property. Security interest arising in purchase or delivery of financial asset. [Repealed.]